Louisiana, session 2026, HB66.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
10 Section 1. R.S. 13:2575.12 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
11 §2575.12. Additional administrative adjudication procedures; city of Alexandria
12 A. As applied in the city of Alexandria, the term "housing violation" as used
13 in this Chapter shall also encompass building codes, zoning, vegetation, and nuisance
14 ordinances, and ordinances that provide for the regulation of sewerage and drainage
15 systems.
16 B. In the city of Alexandria, the procedures for administrative adjudication
17 provided in this Chapter may also be used in matters involving licensing and permits
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 66 ENROLLED
1 and any other ordinance violations as determined by the governing authority of the
2 city of Alexandria.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.